src-fst-morphology-stems-verbs.lexc.md
# Faroese verb stems 

This file documents the file [stems/verbs.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-fao/blob/main/src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc)

The file contains one lexicon:

**LEXICON Verbs** = the lexicon containing all verb stems

## Some irregular verbs
*mega, eiga, eita, gráta, liggja, ...* and 15 more

## some irregular passive verbs

* høggast:høgg FYRIB ; 
* munnhøggast:munn#høgg FYRIB ; 
* bilgjast:bilgj FYRIB ; 
* bylgjast:bylgj sxrefl ; 
* ... etc. 15 more

## The long verb list

The lexica listed here represent the declension patterns
presented in Føroysk orðabók. The lexicon names correspond to the
declension codes in the dictionary.

* fakturera:fakturer s30 ;   
* formturka:form#turk s30 ;   
* svørja:svør s10 ;   
* almannakunngera:al#manna#kunng s31 ;    
* gjøgnumføra:gjøgnum#før s1 ;   
* innføra:inn#før s1 ;   
* útføra:út#før s1 ;   
* innvíga:inn#víg s1 ;   
* annleggja:ann#l s20 ;   ... and more than 6000 more.

Simple declension class verbs

Still to be classified

Double declension class verbs

Finally some candidates to be considered for verb compounding.

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-fao/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc)</small>

---
